Maryland, session 2025, HB0127.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Housing and Community Development
4–901.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(e) “Local rehabilitation program” means a rehabilitation program that uses
Program loans and is administered by a political subdivision OR A NONPROFIT SPONSOR.
(h) “Nonprofit sponsor” means:
(1) a nonprofit organization;
(2) a political subdivision; or
(3) a limited partnership formed to undertake a rehabilitation project that
is eligible wholly or partly for federal programs or incentives, if:
– 1 –

Ch. 232 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) each general partner is a nonprofit organization or a political
subdivision; or
(ii) 1. each general partner is a wholly owned subsidiary of a
nonprofit organization or political subdivision; and
2. a nonprofit organization or political subdivision manages
the rehabilitation project or will receive net cash flow or the residual sale proceeds on the
sale of the rehabilitation project.
(i) “Program” means the Maryland Housing Rehabilitation Program.
4–911.
(a) To ensure that all areas of the State are served, the Department shall allocate
at least annually among the counties the money appropriated for making Program loans
under the Regular Rehabilitation Program.
(b) When allocating money to a county, the Department shall consider:
(1) the number of families of limited income in the county;
(2) the need to rehabilitate buildings in the county;
(3) the capability of the county to administer a local rehabilitation
program; and
(4) other standards that the Department considers relevant to ensure fair
and equitable distribution of money among counties.
(c) The Department may:
(1) allocate on a countywide basis first and then make suballocations
among participating municipal corporations AND NONPROFIT SPONSORS within counties;
(2) allocate up to 25% of the total money available in the Special Loan
Programs Fund to a reserve; and
(3) from time to time, reallocate the money held in the reserve.
4–914.
(a) If the Department certifies a political subdivision OR NONPROFIT SPONSOR
as capable of administering a local rehabilitation program, the political subdivision OR
NONPROFIT SPONSOR may originate and administer Program loans under regulations of
the Department.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 232
(b) (1) By regulation, the Department shall establish standards for
determining the capability of a political subdivision OR NONPROFIT SPONSOR to
administer a local rehabilitation program.
(2) The standards shall include provisions on:
(i) the size, training, and experience of the professional staff that
would administer the Program; and
(ii) the capability of the professional staff to:
1. determine rehabilitation needs;
2. establish rehabilitation programs;
3. evaluate applications for Program loans; and
4. monitor Program loans and the rehabilitation work done
with them.
(c) If the Department determines that a political subdivision OR NONPROFIT
SPONSOR cannot or does not want to administer a local rehabilitation program, the
Department may originate and administer Program loans from the allocation or
suballocation to that political subdivision.
(d) The Department may:
(1) help train employees of political subdivisions AND NONPROFIT
SPONSORS to administer local rehabilitation programs under the standards that the
Department sets; and
(2) provide political subdivisions AND NONPROFIT SPONSORS advice and
technical assistance on the administration of their local rehabilitation programs, including
loan packaging, contractor and bid selection, zoning, marketing, engineering, and related
services.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 3 –